Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,113
Adult disciplinary action; rules posted.

All adult disciplinary action within the system of the department shall be pursuant to sections 83-4,109 to 83-4,123. Inmates shall be informed of rules of behavior and discipline. Such rules shall be posted or otherwise made available to the inmates.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 55.